Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3327
Applicant; reciprocity; requirements; military spouse; temporary license.

(1) An applicant for a license to practice veterinary medicine and surgery based on a license in another state or territory of the United States, the District of Columbia, or a Canadian province shall meet the standards set by the board pursuant to section 38-126 and shall have been actively engaged in the practice of such profession at least one of the three years immediately preceding the application under a license in another state or territory of the United States, the District of Columbia, or a Canadian province.

(2) An applicant for a license to practice as a licensed veterinary technician based on a license in another state or territory of the United States, the District of Columbia, or a Canadian province shall meet the standards set by the board pursuant to section 38-126 and shall have been actively engaged in the practice of such profession at least one of the three years immediately preceding the application under a license in another state or territory of the United States, the District of Columbia, or a Canadian province.

(3) An applicant who is a military spouse may apply for a temporary license to practice veterinary medicine and surgery or to practice as a licensed veterinary technician as provided in section 38-129.01.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1109;

Laws 2017, LB88, § 90.